Wisconsin, session 2025, SB961.
do enact as follows:SB961,11Section 1. 23.176 of the statutes is created to read:SB961,2,2223.176 Cross-country ski permit. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB961,2,53(a) “Proof” means the original cross-country ski permit or temporary cross-4country ski permit receipt issued by the department or an agent appointed under 5sub. (3) (d) 2. or any alternative form of proof designated by rule under s. 23.47 (1).SB961,2,96(b) “Temporary cross-country ski permit receipt” means a receipt issued by 7the department or an agent under sub. (3) (d) 2. that shows that an application and 8the required fees under sub. (4) for a cross-country ski permit have been submitted 9to the department or an agent appointed under sub. (3) (d) 2.SB961,2,1010(c) “Vehicle admission area” has the meaning given in s. 27.01 (7) (a) 3.SB961,3,311(2) Permit required. (a) Except as provided under par. (b), no person may 12cross-country ski on land owned by the state in areas where cross-country skiing is 13authorized, excluding a vehicle admission area, unless a cross-country ski permit 14issued under this section is permanently affixed in a highly visible location on the 1forward half of one ski or the person is carrying proof of a valid temporary cross-2country ski permit receipt, which the person shall exhibit to the department or its 3wardens or other law enforcement officers on demand.SB961,3,54(b) A person is not required to have a cross-country ski permit under par. (a) 5in order to cross-country ski on land owned by the state if any of the following apply:SB961,3,761. The person is authorized to cross-country ski on the land as part of an 7organized and authorized event.SB961,3,982. The person is authorized to cross-country ski on a state trail under a trail 9pass issued by the department under s. 23.175.SB961,3,1210(c) A cross-country ski permit issued under this section does not authorize a 11person to cross-country ski in an area on land owned by the state where cross-12country skiing is prohibited.SB961,3,2013(3) Issuance. (a) The department shall issue a cross-country ski permit and 14a temporary cross-country ski permit receipt to a person who applies for the permit 15and who pays the fees required under sub. (4). The application for a cross-country 16ski permit shall be on the form and contain the information required by the 17department. The department or an agent appointed under par. (d) 2. may not issue 18a cross-country ski permit or a temporary cross-country ski permit receipt to the 19applicant until the applicant complies with the requirements specified in this 20paragraph.SB961,3,2221(b) A cross-country ski permit issued under this section is valid for the 22calendar year in which it is issued.SB961,4,223(c) The department shall prepare, procure the printing of, and supply all 1necessary forms for applications and cross-country ski permits issued under this 2section.SB961,4,53(d) In the course of issuing cross-country ski permits and temporary cross-4country ski permit receipts under this section, the department may do any of the 5following:SB961,4,761. Directly issue the cross-country ski permits and temporary cross-country 7ski permit receipts.SB961,4,1082. Appoint persons who are not employees of the department to issue the 9cross-country ski permits and temporary cross-country ski permit receipts as 10agents of the department.SB961,4,1211(e) The department may promulgate rules regulating the activities of persons 12who are authorized as agents under par. (d) 2.SB961,4,1513(4) Fees. (a) A person who applies for a cross-country ski permit under this 14section shall pay one of the following fees to the department, whichever is 15applicable:SB961,4,16161. For an adult, $40.SB961,4,17172. For a child 12 years of age or older, $20.SB961,4,18183. For a child under the age of 12, $0.SB961,5,219(b) Any person, including the department, that issues a cross-country ski 20permit or temporary cross-country ski permit receipt under this section to a person 2112 years of age or older shall collect, in addition to the applicable fee under par. (a), 22an issuing fee of 75 cents. An agent appointed under sub. (3) (d) 2. may retain 50 23cents of each issuing fee to compensate the agent for the agent’s services in issuing 24the temporary cross-country ski permit receipt. Any issuing fee collected by an 1employee of the department shall be remitted to the department together with the 2fee under par. (a).SB961,23Section 2. 23.47 (1) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB961,5,5423.47 (1) (e) A cross-country ski permit or temporary cross-country ski permit 5receipt under s. 23.176.SB961,5,66